Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1112
Indians; preferential treatment.

Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall apply to any business or enterprise on or near an Indian reservation with respect to any publicly announced employment practice of such business or enterprise under which a preferential treatment is given to any individual because he or she is an Indian living on or near a reservation.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 12, p. 788;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 12.